Hawaii statutes.
[§157-34.5] Milk shortage. In the
event of a shortage, the board shall require all milk produced within the milk
shed first serve the needs of the consumers within the milk shed. [L 1988, c
25, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next